Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.44.079

Rape of a child in the third degree.

(1) A person is guilty of rape of a child in the third degree when the person has sexual intercourse with another who is at least fourteen years old but less than sixteen years old and the perpetrator is at least forty-eight months older than the victim.

(2) Rape of a child in the third degree is a class C felony.

[ 2021 c 142 s 4; 1988 c 145 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 142: See note following RCW 9A.44.050.

Effective date—Savings—Application—1988 c 145: See notes following RCW 9A.44.010.